src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Buryaad noun affixes

We have two lexica, n1 and n2, 
n1 with -нар plural and V-initial Gen, Ins, and
n2 with -ууд plural and г-initial Gen, Ins

The noun classes

* **LEXICON nx ** unclassified nouns, to n2 for now

* **LEXICON n1 ** with Gen -IIN, and -нар- suffix for oblique cases

* **LEXICON n2 ** with Gen -GAj and -ууд suffič for oblique cases

The class-specific case morphology (Gen, Ins)
* **LEXICON case1 ** Gen, Ins for n1 nouns, and pointing to common cases

* **LEXICON case2 ** Gen, Ins for n2 nouns, and pointing to common cases

* **LEXICON case3 ** case3 are numerals, for now pointing to case2

The morphology common to the different stem classes

* **LEXICON commoncase  ** common treatment of Nom, Dat, Acc, Abl, Com for all nouns

* **LEXICON Poss ** for Px, common for all nouns

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-bxr/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
